test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-aassad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - čaahâđ: # MLO, checked

    čaahâđ+V+Inf: čaahâđ
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: čahhuđ
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čahhuum
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: čahhuuh
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čáhhoo
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čáhhojeen
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: čahhuv
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: čahhup
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čáhhojeh
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čahhuu
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čáhhojim
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čahhui
    čaahâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čáhhojii
    
    čaahâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čavâstâm
    čaahâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čaavâst
    čaahâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čavâsteen
    čaahâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čavâsteh
    čaahâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čaavâst
    čaahâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čavâstim
    čaahâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čavâstij
    čaahâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čavâstii

    čaahâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čavâdâm
    čaahâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: čavâdah
    čaahâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čaavâd
    čaahâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čavâdeen
    čaahâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: čaavâdvettee
    čaahâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: čavâdává
    čaahâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čavâdeh
    čaahâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čaavâd
    čaahâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čavâdim
    čaahâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čavâdij
    čaahâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čavâdii

    čaahâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čavâttâm
    čaahâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: čavâttah
    čaahâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čaavât
    čaahâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čavâtteen
    čaahâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čavâtteh
    čaahâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čaavât
    čaahâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čavâttim
    čaahâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čavâttij
    čaahâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čavâttii

    čaahâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: čaahâliđ
    čaahâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čahâlâm
    čaahâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čaahâl
    čaahâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čahâleen
    čaahâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čahâleh
    čaahâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čaahâl
    čaahâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čahâlim
    čaahâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čahâlij
    čaahâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čahâlii

    čaahâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čavâškuáđám
    čaahâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čavâškuát
    čaahâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čavâškyetteen
    čaahâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [čavâškyeteh, čavâškyetih]
    čaahâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čavâškyeđe
    čaahâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čavâškuottim
    čaahâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čavâškuođij
    čaahâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čavâškuottii

  Verb - vaattâđ: # MLO, checked

    vaattâđ+V+Inf: vaattâđ
    vaattâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vattuum
    vaattâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vattuuh
    vaattâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: váttoo
    vaattâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: váttojeen
    vaattâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vattuv
    vaattâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vattup
    vaattâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: váttojeh
    vaattâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vattuu
    vaattâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: váttojim
    vaattâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vattui
    vaattâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: váttojii
    
    vaattâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vađâstâm
    vaattâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaađâst
    vaattâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vađâsteen
    vaattâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vađâsteh
    vaattâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vaađâst
    vaattâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vađâstim
    vaattâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vađâstij
    vaattâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vađâstii
    
    vaattâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vađâdâm
    vaattâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaađâd
    vaattâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vađâdeen
    vaattâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vađâdeh
    vaattâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vaađâd
    vaattâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vađâdim
    vaattâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vađâdij
    vaattâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vađâdii

    vaattâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vađâttâm
    vaattâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaađât
    vaattâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vađâtteen
    vaattâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vađâtteh
    vaattâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vaađât
    vaattâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vađâttim
    vaattâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vađâttij
    vaattâđ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vađâttii
    
    vaattâđ+V+Der/l+V+Inf: vaattâliđ
    vaattâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vatâlâm
    vaattâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaattâl
    vaattâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vatâleen
    vaattâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vaattâlvettee
    vaattâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vatâleh
    vaattâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vaattâl
    vaattâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vatâlim
    vaattâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vatâlij
    vaattâđ+V+Der/l+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vatâlii

    vaattâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vađâškuáđám
    vaattâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vađâškuát
    vaattâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vađâškyetteen
    vaattâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [vađâškyeteh, vađâškyetih]
    vaattâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vađâškyeđe
    vaattâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vađâškuottim
    vaattâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vađâškuođij
    vaattâđ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vađâškuottii

  Verb - peerrâđ: # 

    peerrâđ+V+Inf: peerrâđ
    peerrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: perruum
    peerrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: perruuh
    peerrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piärroo
    peerrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: piärrojeen
    peerrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: perruv
    peerrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: perrup
    peerrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: piärrojeh
    peerrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: perruu
    peerrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: piärrojim
    peerrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: perrui
    peerrâđ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: piärrojii
    
    peerrâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: perâstâm
    peerrâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peerâst
    peerrâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: perâsteen
    peerrâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: perâsteh
    peerrâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: peerâst
    peerrâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: perâstim
    peerrâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: perâstij
    peerrâđ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: perâstii
    
    peerrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: perâdâm
    peerrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peerâd
    peerrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: perâdeen
    peerrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: perâdeh
    peerrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: peerâd
    peerrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: perâdim
    peerrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: perâdij
    peerrâđ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: perâdii
